Florida, session 2026, HB1349.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
32
33 Section 1. Paragraph (e) of subsection (2), paragraphs
34 (b), (c), and (d) of subsection (4), paragraph (b) of subsection
35 (5), and paragraph (a) of subsection (7) of section 215.555,
36 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
37 215.555 Florida Hurricane Catastrophe Fund.—
38 (2) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section:
39 (e) "Retention" means the amount of losses below which an
40 insurer is not entitled to reimbursement from the fund. An
41 insurer's retention shall be calculated as follows:
42 1. The board shall calculate and report to each insurer
43 the retention multiples for that year. For the contract year
44 beginning June 1, 2026 2005, the retention multiple must shall
45 be equal to $8.5 $4.5 billion divided by the total estimated
46 reimbursement premium for the contract year; for subsequent
47 years, the retention multiple shall be equal to $4.5 billion,
48 adjusted based upon the reported exposure for the contract year
49 occurring 2 years before the particular contract year to reflect
50 the percentage growth in exposure to the fund for covered
Page 2 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1349-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1349 2026
51 policies since 2004, divided by the total estimated
52 reimbursement premium for the contract year. Total reimbursement
53 premium for purposes of the calculation under this subparagraph
54 shall be estimated using the assumption that all insurers have
55 selected the 90-percent coverage level.
56 2. The retention multiple as determined under subparagraph
57 1. shall be adjusted to reflect the coverage level elected by
58 the insurer. For insurers electing the 100-percent coverage
59 level, the adjusted retention multiple is 90 percent of the
60 amount determined under subparagraph 1. For insurers electing
61 the 90-percent coverage level, the adjusted retention multiple
62 is 100 percent of the amount determined under subparagraph 1.
63 For insurers electing the 75-percent coverage level, the
64 retention multiple is 120 percent of the amount determined under
65 subparagraph 1. For insurers electing the 45-percent coverage
66 level, the adjusted retention multiple is 200 percent of the
67 amount determined under subparagraph 1.
68 3. An insurer shall determine its provisional retention by
69 multiplying its provisional reimbursement premium by the
70 applicable adjusted retention multiple and shall determine its
71 actual retention by multiplying its actual reimbursement premium
72 by the applicable adjusted retention multiple.
73 4. For insurers who experience multiple covered events
74 causing loss during the contract year, beginning June 1, 2005,
75 each insurer's full retention shall be applied to each of the
Page 3 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1349-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1349 2026
76 covered events causing the two largest losses for that insurer.
77 For each other covered event resulting in losses, the insurer's
78 retention shall be reduced to one-third of the full retention.
79 The reimbursement contract must shall provide for the
80 reimbursement of losses for each covered event based on the full
81 retention with adjustments made to reflect the reduced
82 retentions on or after January 1 of the contract year provided
83 the insurer reports its losses as specified in the reimbursement
84 contract.
85 (4) REIMBURSEMENT CONTRACTS.—
86 (b)1. The contract must shall contain a promise by the
87 board to reimburse the insurer for 45 percent, 75 percent, or 90
88 percent, or 100 percent of its losses and applicable loss
89 adjustment expenses from each covered event in excess of the
90 insurer's retention, plus 5 percent of the reimbursed losses to
91 cover loss adjustment expenses. For contracts and rates
92 effective on or after June 1, 2026 2019, the loss adjustment
93 expense included reimbursement must be the lesser of 25 10
94 percent of the total subject losses before reimbursement or the
95 total subject actual loss adjustment expenses reimbursed losses.
96 2. The insurer must elect one of the percentage coverage
97 levels specified in this paragraph and may, upon renewal of a
98 reimbursement contract, elect a lower percentage coverage level
99 if no revenue bonds issued under subsection (6) after a covered
100 event are outstanding, or elect a higher percentage coverage
Page 4 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1349-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1349 2026
101 level, regardless of whether or not revenue bonds are
102 outstanding. All members of an insurer group must elect the same
103 percentage coverage level. Any joint underwriting association,
104 risk apportionment plan, or other entity created under s.
105 627.351 must elect the 90-percent coverage level.
106 3. The contract must shall provide that reimbursement
107 amounts may shall not be reduced by reinsurance paid or payable
108 to the insurer from other sources.
109 (c)1. The contract must shall also provide that the
110 obligation of the board with respect to all contracts covering a
111 particular contract year is shall not exceed the actual claims-
112 paying capacity of the fund up to a limit of $17 billion for
113 that contract year, unless the board determines that there is
114 sufficient estimated claims-paying capacity to provide $17
115 billion of capacity for the current contract year and an
116 additional $17 billion of capacity for subsequent contract
117 years. If the board makes such a determination, the estimated
118 claims-paying capacity for the particular contract year shall be
119 determined by adding to the $17 billion limit one-half of the
120 fund's estimated claims-paying capacity in excess of $34
121 billion. However, the dollar growth in the limit may not
122 increase in any year by an amount greater than the dollar growth
123 of the balance of the fund as of December 31, less any premiums
124 or interest attributable to optional coverage, as defined by
125 rule which occurred over the prior calendar year.
Page 5 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1349-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1349 2026
126 2. In May and October of the contract year, the board
127 shall publish in the Florida Administrative Register a statement
128 of the fund's estimated borrowing capacity, the fund's estimated
129 claims-paying capacity, and the projected balance of the fund as
130 of December 31. After the end of each calendar year, the board
131 shall notify insurers of the estimated borrowing capacity,
132 estimated claims-paying capacity, and the balance of the fund as
133 of December 31 to provide insurers with data necessary to assist
134 them in determining their retention and projected payout from
135 the fund for loss reimbursement purposes. In conjunction with
136 the development of the premium formula, as provided for in
137 subsection (5), the board shall publish factors or multiples
138 that assist insurers in determining their retention and
139 projected payout for the next contract year. For all regulatory
140 and reinsurance purposes, an insurer may calculate its projected
141 payout from the fund as its share of the total fund premium for
142 the current contract year multiplied by the sum of the projected
143 balance of the fund as of December 31 and the estimated
144 borrowing capacity for that contract year as reported under this
145 subparagraph.
146 (d)1. For purposes of determining potential liability and
147 to aid in the sound administration of the fund, the contract
148 must shall require each insurer to report such insurer's losses
149 from each covered event on an interim basis, as directed by the
150 board. The contract must shall require the insurer to report to
Page 6 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1349-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1349 2026
151 the board no later than December 31 of each year, and quarterly
152 thereafter, its reimbursable losses from covered events for the
153 year. The contract must shall require the board to determine and
154 pay, as soon as practicable after receiving these reports of
155 reimbursable losses, the initial amount of reimbursement due and
156 adjustments to this amount based on later loss information. The
157 adjustments to reimbursement amounts must shall require the
158 board to pay, or the insurer to return, amounts reflecting the
159 most recent calculation of losses.
160 2. In determining reimbursements pursuant to this
161 subsection, the contract shall provide that the board shall pay
162 to each insurer such insurer's projected payout, which is the
163 amount of reimbursement it is owed, up to an amount equal to the
164 insurer's share of the actual premium paid for that contract
165 year, multiplied by the actual claims-paying capacity available
166 for that contract year.
167 3. The board may reimburse insurers for amounts up to the
168 published factors or multiples for determining each
169 participating insurer's retention and projected payout derived
170 as a result of the development of the premium formula in those
171 situations in which the total reimbursement of losses to such
172 insurers would not exceed the estimated claims-paying capacity
173 of the fund. Otherwise, the projected payout factors or
174 multiples shall be reduced uniformly among all insurers to
175 reflect the estimated claims-paying capacity.
Page 7 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1349-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1349 2026
176 (5) REIMBURSEMENT PREMIUMS.—
177 (b) The State Board of Administration shall select an
178 independent consultant to develop a formula for determining the
179 actuarially indicated premium to be paid to the fund. The
180 hurricane loss portion of the formula must be determined by
181 averaging the results of all the catastrophe models approved by
182 the Florida Commission on Hurricane Loss Projection Methodology.
183 The formula must shall specify, for each zip code or other
184 limited geographical area, the amount of premium to be paid by
185 an insurer for each $1,000 of insured value under covered
186 policies in that zip code or other area. In establishing
187 premiums, the board shall consider the coverage elected under
188 paragraph (4)(b) and any factors that tend to enhance the
189 actuarial sophistication of ratemaking for the fund, including
190 deductibles, type of construction, type of coverage provided,
191 relative concentration of risks, and other such factors deemed
192 by the board to be appropriate. The formula may must provide for
193 a cash build-up factor. For the 2009-2010 contract year, the
194 factor is 5 percent. For the 2010-2011 contract year, the factor
195 is 10 percent. For the 2011-2012 contract year, the factor is 15
196 percent. For the 2012-2013 contract year, the factor is 20
197 percent. For the 2013-2014 contract year and thereafter, the
198 factor is 25 percent; however, the cash build-up factor must be
199 frozen beginning in the 2026-2027 contract year and must freeze
200 for a 12-month period ending no later than July 1, 2027. Any
Page 8 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1349-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1349 2026
201 savings realized as a result of the freeze of the cash build-up
202 factor must be passed directly to the consumer. The formula may
203 provide for a procedure to determine the premiums to be paid by
204 new insurers that begin writing covered policies after the
205 beginning of a contract year, taking into consideration when the
206 insurer starts writing covered policies, the potential exposure
207 of the insurer, the potential exposure of the fund, the
208 administrative costs to the insurer and to the fund, and any
209 other factors deemed appropriate by the board. The formula must
210 be approved by unanimous vote of the board. The board may, at
211 any time, revise the formula pursuant to the procedure provided
212 in this paragraph. The board shall file the premiums to be paid
213 with the Office of Insurance Regulation, and the office shall
214 review such premiums.
215 (7) ADDITIONAL POWERS AND DUTIES.—
216 (a) The board may procure reinsurance from reinsurers
217 acceptable to the Office of Insurance Regulation for the purpose
218 of maximizing the capacity of the fund and may enter into
219 capital market transactions, including, but not limited to,
220 industry loss warranties, catastrophe bonds, side-car
221 arrangements, or financial contracts permissible for the board's
222 usage under s. 215.47(11) and (12), consistent with prudent
223 management of the fund. The cost of any reinsurance or other
224 capital market transaction other than issuing bonds secured by
225 assessments purchased by the board to maximize the claims-paying
Page 9 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1349-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1349 2026
226 capacity of the fund may not be added to the actuarially
227 determined cost of the reimbursement contracts.
228 Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
229
Page 10 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1349-00